Maryland, session 2025, SB0039.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Criminal Procedure
SUBTITLE 5. PETITION TO MODIFY OR REDUCE SENTENCE.
8–501.
(A) (1) NOTWITHSTANDING ANY OTHER PROVISION OF LAW, A PERSON
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0039*

SENATE BILL 39
WHO IS SERVING A TERM OF CONFINEMENT MAY PETITION THE COURT TO MODIFY
OR REDUCE THE SENTENCE, REGARDLESS OF WHETHER THE PERSON FILED A
TIMELY MOTION FOR RECONSIDERATION UNDER MARYLAND RULE 4–345(E) OR
WHETHER A PRIOR MOTION FOR RECONSIDERATION WAS DENIED BY THE COURT, IF:
(I) THE PETITIONER HAS SERVED THE GREATER OF AT LEAST:
1. 20 YEARS OF THE TERM OF CONFINEMENT WITHOUT
APPLICATION OF DIMINUTION CREDITS; OR
2. THE EQUIVALENT OF 25 YEARS OF THE TERM OF
CONFINEMENT WITH APPLICATION OF DIMINUTION CREDITS; AND
(II) AT LEAST 5 YEARS HAVE PASSED SINCE THE COURT
DECIDED ANY PETITION PREVIOUSLY FILED BY THE PETITIONER UNDER THIS
SECTION.
(2) A PETITIONER SHALL FILE A PETITION TO MODIFY OR REDUCE A
SENTENCE UNDER THIS SECTION IN THE CIRCUIT COURT FOR THE COUNTY IN WHICH
THE SENTENCE WAS IMPOSED.
(B) (1) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH (5) OF THIS SUBSECTION, A
COURT SHALL HOLD A HEARING ON A PETITION TO REDUCE OR MODIFY A SENTENCE
UNDER THIS SECTION.
(2) THE HEARING REQUIRED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION SHALL BE HELD AFTER THE COURT HAS DETERMINED THAT:
(I) THE PETITIONER IS ELIGIBLE TO FILE A PETITION UNDER
SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION; AND
(II) THE STATE’S ATTORNEY HAS SATISFIED THE
REQUIREMENTS FOR PROVIDING NOTICE TO EACH VICTIM AND VICTIM’S
REPRESENTATIVE UNDER SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION.
(3) IF A HEARING IS HELD UNDER THIS SECTION:
(I) THE HEARING AND THE COURT’S DECISION REGARDING
WHETHER TO MODIFY OR REDUCE THE PETITIONER’S SENTENCE SHALL BE ON THE
RECORD AND IN OPEN COURT; AND
(II) THE COURT SHALL STATE THE REASONS FOR ITS DECISION
REGARDING WHETHER TO MODIFY OR REDUCE THE PETITIONER’S SENTENCE.

SENATE BILL 39 3
(4) A PETITIONER MAY WAIVE THE RIGHT TO BE PRESENT AT A
HEARING HELD UNDER THIS SECTION.
(5) A COURT MAY NOT HOLD A HEARING UNDER THIS SECTION IF THE
COURT DETERMINES THAT THE PETITIONER IS NOT ELIGIBLE TO FILE A PETITION
UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION.
(C) (1) THE STATE’S ATTORNEY SHALL GIVE NOTICE TO EACH VICTIM
AND VICTIM’S REPRESENTATIVE WHO HAS FILED A CRIME VICTIM NOTIFICATION
REQUEST FORM UNDER § 11–104 OF THIS ARTICLE OR WHO HAS SUBMITTED A
WRITTEN REQUEST TO THE STATE’S ATTORNEY TO BE NOTIFIED OF SUBSEQUENT
PROCEEDINGS UNDER § 11–503 OF THIS ARTICLE:
(I) THAT A PETITION TO MODIFY OR REDUCE A SENTENCE HAS
BEEN FILED UNDER THIS SECTION;
(II) EITHER THAT THE PETITION HAS BEEN DENIED WITHOUT A
HEARING, OR OF THE DATE, TIME, AND LOCATION OF THE HEARING; AND
(III) IF A HEARING IS TO BE HELD, THAT EACH VICTIM OR
VICTIM’S REPRESENTATIVE MAY ATTEND AND TESTIFY.
(2) A VICTIM OR A VICTIM’S REPRESENTATIVE IS ENTITLED TO AN
OPPORTUNITY TO ATTEND AND TESTIFY IN THE MANNER PROVIDED BY MARYLAND
RULE 4–345.
(D) A PETITIONER WHO HAS BEEN DETERMINED TO BE ELIGIBLE TO FILE A
PETITION UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION IS ENTITLED TO THE
ASSISTANCE OF COUNSEL AND, IF INDIGENT, TO REPRESENTATION BY THE OFFICE
OF THE PUBLIC DEFENDER.
(E) (1) FOR A PETITIONER WHO WAS SENTENCED TO A TERM OF
CONFINEMENT FOR AN OFFENSE THAT WAS COMMITTED WHEN THE PETITIONER
WAS A MINOR, THE COURT SHALL MODIFY THE SENTENCE IN A MANNER
REASONABLY CALCULATED TO RESULT IN THE PETITIONER’S RELEASE WITHIN 3
YEARS IF THE COURT FINDS THAT THE PETITIONER HAS MATURED AND
REHABILITATED SUCH THAT RETENTION OF THE SENTENCE IS NOT NECESSARY FOR
THE PROTECTION OF THE PUBLIC.
(2) FOR A PETITIONER WHO WAS SENTENCED TO A TERM OF
CONFINEMENT WHEN THE PETITIONER WAS AT LEAST 18 YEARS OLD, THE COURT
MAY MODIFY THE SENTENCE IF THE COURT FINDS THAT RETENTION OF THE
SENTENCE IS NOT NECESSARY FOR THE PROTECTION OF THE PUBLIC.

SENATE BILL 39
(3) A COURT MAY NOT MODIFY OR REDUCE A SENTENCE UNDER THIS
SECTION UNLESS THE COURT PROVIDES THE STATE’S ATTORNEY AND EACH VICTIM
OR VICTIM’S REPRESENTATIVE WHO REQUESTS AN OPPORTUNITY TO BE HEARD THE
OPPORTUNITY TO OBJECT TO THE PETITION TO MODIFY OR REDUCE THE SENTENCE.
(4) A COURT MAY NOT INCREASE THE LENGTH OF A SENTENCE UNDER
THIS SECTION.
(F) WITHIN 30 DAYS AFTER THE COURT PASSES AN ORDER IN ACCORDANCE
WITH THIS SECTION, THE PETITIONER OR THE STATE MAY APPLY TO THE
APPELLATE COURT OF MARYLAND FOR LEAVE TO APPEAL THE ORDER IN THE
MANNER PROVIDED BY MARYLAND RULE 8–204.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.